Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.220

Dissenters' rights—Notice.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is approved at a shareholders' meeting, the corporation shall within ten days after the effective date of the corporate action deliver to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of RCW 23B.13.210(1) a notice in compliance with subsection (6) of this section.

(2) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is approved without a vote of shareholders in accordance with *RCW 23B.11A.040, the corporation shall within 10 days after the effective date of the corporate action deliver to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of RCW 23B.13.210(2) a notice in compliance with subsection (6) of this section.

(3) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020 is approved without a vote of shareholders in accordance with RCW 23B.07.040, the notice delivered pursuant to RCW 23B.07.040(3)(b) to shareholders who satisfied the requirements of RCW 23B.13.210(3) shall comply with subsection (6) of this section.

(4) In the case of proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020(1)(a)(ii), the corporation shall within ten days after the effective date of the corporate action deliver to all shareholders of the subsidiary other than the parent a notice in compliance with subsection (6) of this section.

(5) In the case of proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under RCW 23B.13.020(1)(d) that, pursuant to RCW 23B.10.020(4)(b), is not required to be approved by the shareholders of the corporation, the corporation shall within ten days after the effective date of the corporate action deliver to all shareholders entitled to dissent under RCW 23B.13.020(1)(d) a notice in compliance with subsection (6) of this section.

(6) Any notice under subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section must:

(a) State where the payment demand must be sent and where and when certificates for certificated shares must be deposited;

(b) Inform holders of uncertificated shares to what extent transfer of the shares will be restricted after the payment demand is received;

(c) Supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action and requires that the person asserting dissenters' rights certify whether or not the person acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before that date;

(d) Set a date by which the corporation must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than thirty nor more than sixty days after the date the notice in subsection (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is delivered; and

(e) Be accompanied by a copy of this chapter.

[2024 c 22 s 25; 2022 c 42 s 116; 2013 c 97 s 2; 2009 c 189 s 44; 2002 c 297 s 38; 1989 c 165 s 145.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 23B.11A.040 appears to be erroneous. RCW 23B.11A.045 was apparently intended.